apertium-gag.gag.lexc
LEXICON NP-TOP
%<np%>%<top%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION  ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%' FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION  ; ! Err/Orth

LEXICON NP-ORG
%<np%>%<org%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;
%<np%>%<org%>%<attr%>: # ;

LEXICON NP-TOP-RUS
%<np%>%<top%>:%{☭%} FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION  ;
%<np%>%<top%>:%' FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION  ; ! Err/Orth


LEXICON NP-AL
%<np%>%<al%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION  ;
%<np%>%<al%>:%' FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION  ; ! Err/Orth

LEXICON NUM-DIST

%<num%>%<dist%>: # ;

LEXICON NUM 
%<num%>: # ;
%<num%>%<subst%>: SUBST ; 
%<num%>%<ord%>:%>%{i%}nc%{I%} # ;
%<num%>%<ord%>%<subst%>:%>%{i%}nc%{I%} SUBST  ;

LEXICON NUM-ROMAN
%<num%>: # ;

LEXICON PRON-REF
%<prn%>%<ref%>: POSSESSIVES ;
%<prn%>%<ref%>%<pl%>:%>%{L%}%{A%}r POSSESSIVES ;

LEXICON DET-QNT
%<det%>%<qnt%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-IND
%<det%>%<ind%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-REF
%<det%>%<ref%>: # ;

LEXICON DET-DEM
%<det%>%<dem%>: # ;

LEXICON A1 

%<adj%>: # ;               ! <attr> reading
%<adj%>: CLITIC-COPULA ;

LEXICON A2 

%<adj%>: # ;               ! <attr> reading
%<adj%>: CLITIC-COPULA ;
%<adj%>%<subst%>: SUBST ; 

LEXICON NP-ANT-M
%<np%>%<ant%>%<m%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NP-ANT-F
%<np%>%<ant%>%<f%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ;

LEXICON NP-COG-MF 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; ! FIXME

LEXICON NP-PAT-VICH

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:iç FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; ! FIXME
%<np%>%<pat%>%<m%>:iç FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; ! FIXME
%<np%>%<pat%>%<f%>:na FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; ! FIXME

LEXICON NP-COG-OV

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>: FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; ! FIXME
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:a FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; ! FIXME

LEXICON NP-COG-SKIJ

%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:iy FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; ! FIXME
%<np%>%<cog%>%<m%>:i FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; ! FIXME ! Dir/LR
%<np%>%<cog%>%<f%>:aya FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; ! FIXME

LEXICON NP-COG-OGLU

%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:u FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; 
%<np%>%<cog%>%<mf%>:o FULL-NOMINAL-INFLECTION ; ! Dir/LR


LEXICON PRON-DEM-O
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:nun # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:na # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:nı # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:nda # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ndan # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:nnan # ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-SU
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:nu # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:nun # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:nda # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ndan # ;

LEXICON PRON-DEM-BU
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<nom%>: # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<acc%>:nu # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<gen%>:nun # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<loc%>:nda # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:ndan # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<abl%>:nnan # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<dat%>:na # ;
%<prn%>%<dem%>%<pl%>:nnar CASES ;


LEXICON PRON-IND

%<prn%>%<ind%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR

%<prn%>%<itg%>: SUBST ;

LEXICON PRON-QNT

%<prn%>%<qnt%>: POSSESSIVES ; !N-INFL-COMMON ; ! FIXME: Check contlex


LEXICON ABBR

%<abbr%>: # ;

LEXICON ABBR-INIT

%<abbr%>: # ;
%<abbr%>%+: Cognomena ;
%<abbr%>%+A%.:A%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Ä%.:Ä%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Â%.:Â%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Á%.:Á%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+B%.:B%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+V%.:V%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+G%.:G%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+D%.:D%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+E%.:E%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Ê%.:Ê%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+J%.:J%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Z%.:Z%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+I%.:I%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+İ%.:İ%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+K%.:K%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+L%.:L%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+M%.:M%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+N%.:N%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+O%.:O%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Ö%.:Ö%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+P%.:P%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+R%.:R%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+S%.:S%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Ş%.:Ş%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+T%.:T%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Ţ%.:Ţ%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+U%.:U%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Ü%.:Ü%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+F%.:F%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+H%.:H%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+C%.:C%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Ç%.:Ç%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Ş%.:Ş%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Y%.:Y%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Ä%.:Ä%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Ž%.:Ž%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
%<abbr%>%+Š%.:Š%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""


LEXICON POST
%<post%>: # ;

LEXICON INTERJ

%<ij%>: # ;


LEXICON BARB

%<barb%>: # ;



!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          L E X I C O N                                  !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Miscellaneous 

da%<postadv%>:da # ;
tä%<postadv%>:tä # ;
da%<postadv%>:dä # ;
de%<postadv%>:de # ;
te%<postadv%>:te # ;
dee%<postadv%>:dee # ;
daa%<postadv%>:daa # ;
dir%<postadv%>:dir # ;
mı%<qst%>:mi # ;
mı%<qst%>:mı # ;
mı%<qst%>:mu # ; 
mı%<qst%>:mü # ;


LEXICON Conjunctions
yada:yada CC ;
veya:veya CC ; ! ""
hem:hem CC ;
ama:ama CC ; 
ama:amma CC ;
ne:ne CC ;
ve:ve CC ; ! "and"
a:a CC ; ! ""
ya:ya CC ; ! ""
bilä:bilä CS ;
çünkü:çünkü CS ;
çünki:çünki CS ; ! ""
bila:bila CA ;


ki:ki CS ; ! ""
yoksa:yoksa CA ; ! ""
hani:hani CA ; ! ""
zerä:zerä CA ; ! ""
osa:osa CA ; ! ""
hadi:hadi CA ;


diy:diy CS ;
deyi:deyi CS ; ! ""
deyni:deyni CS ; ! ""


LEXICON Postpositions
gibi:gibi POST ; ! ""
ardına:ardına POST ;
boyunca:boyunca POST ; ! ""
dee:dee POST ; ! ""
göre:görä POST ; ! ""
göre:göre POST ; ! ""
için:için POST ; ! ""
kadar:kadar POST ; ! ""
dolayı:dolayı POST ; ! ""
ilgili:ilgili POST ; ! "regarding"
boyunca:boyunca POST ; ! "during"
dolayın:dolayın POST ; ! ""
ise:ise POST ; ! ""
başça:başça POST ; ! ""
deyni:deyni POST ; ! ""
                                    

ötää:ötää POST ; !""
öter:öter POST; ! ""


LEXICON Pronouns 

bän:b PRON-PERS-BÄN ; ! "я"
!ben:b PRON-PERS-BÄN ;
sän:s PRON-PERS-SÄN ; ! "ты"
!sen:s PRON-PERS-SÄN ;
o:o PRON-PERS-O ; ! "он, она, оно"
biz:biz PRON-PERS-BIZ ; ! "мы"
siz:siz PRON-PERS-SIZ ; ! "вы"
onnar:onnar PRON-PERS-ONNAR ; ! "они"
onnar:onlar PRON-PERS-ONNAR ; !        ! Err/Orth


kim:kim PRON-INTERR ;
kendi:kendi PRON-REF ; ! "self"
kendisi:kendisi PRON-REF ; ! "self"
birisi:birisi PRON-QNT ; ! "somebody"
hangı:hangı PRON-INTERR ;
hangı:hangi PRON-INTERR ;
neyi:neyi PRON-INTERR ;
ne:ne PRON-INTERR ;
ne:nä PRON-INTERR ; ! Err/Orth
kimisi:kimisi PRON-INTERR ;
hepsi:hepsi PRON-QNT  ;
kimsey:kimsey PRON-INTERR ;

ora:ora PRON-ADV ;
ora:or PRON-ADV ;
bura:bura PRON-ADV ;


bu:bu PRON-DEM-BU ; ! ""
şu:şu PRON-DEM-SU ; ! ""
o:o PRON-DEM-O ; ! ""
öz:öz PRON-REF ; ! ""
kendibaşı:kendibaşı PRON-REF ; ! "self" 

bişey:bişey PRON-IND ; ! ""
herkez:herkez PRON-IND ; ! ""
herkez:herkes PRON-IND ; ! "" ! Err/Orth

kimi:kimi PRON-IND ; ! ""


LEXICON Determiners

dak:dak DET-QNT ;
hep:hep DET-QNT ; ! "all" @@@@ TAKES CASES
bu% kadar:bu% kadar DET-QNT ; ! "this much"
şu% kadar:şu% kadar DET-QNT ; ! "that much"
o% kadar:o% kadar DET-QNT ; ! "this much"
nekadar:nekadar DET-QNT ; ! "how much"
birer:birer DET-QNT ;

biraz:biraz DET-QNT ; ! "a bit"
zeedä:zeedä DET-QNT ; ! "a lot"
kendi:kendi DET-REF ; ! ""
kaç:kaç DET-QNT ; ! ""
okadar:okadar DET-QNT ; ! ""
bukadar:bukadar DET-QNT ; ! "this much"
neyä:neyä DET-QNT ;
bazı:bazı DET-QNT ;
çoyu:çoyu DET-QNT ;
birkaç:birkaç DET-IND ; ! "some"
birär:birär DET-QNT ; ! "one each"
herbir:herbir DET-IND ; !
bişey:bişey DET-IND ;
öbür:öbür DET-DEM ; !  "the other" 


kere:kere DET-QNT ;


LEXICON Interjections 


amin:amin INTERJ ; 


LEXICON Punctuation

.%<sent%>:. # ;
%:%<sent%>:%: # ;
%;%<sent%>:%; # ;
%!%<sent%>:%! # ;
%-%<guio%>:%- # ; ! hyphen/minus
%–%<guio%>:%– # ; ! en dash
%—%<guio%>:%— # ; ! em dash
,%<cm%>:, # ;
%?%<sent%>:%? # ;
%'%<apos%>:%' # ;
%”%<rquot%>:%” # ;
%"%<sent%>:%" # ;
%«%<lquot%>:%« # ;

%»%<rquot%>:%» # ;
%“%<lquot%>:%“ # ;
%(%<lpar%>:%( # ;
%]%<rpar%>:%] # ;
%[%<lpar%>:%[ # ;
%)%<rpar%>:%) # ;
%/%<sent%>:%/ # ;

! Temporary numeral lexicon
<[%0 | 1 | 2 | 3 | 4 | 5 | 6 | 7 | 8 | 9]+>  DIGITLEX ; ! Use/Circ

LEXICON Numerals 
üç:üç NUM ;
beş:beş NUM;
yedi:yedi NUM ;
dokuz:dokuz NUM ;
onüç:onüç NUM ; ! ""
onyedi:onyedi NUM ; ! ""
otuz:otuz NUM ;
seksen:seksen NUM ; 
bin:bin NUM ;
ikişär:ikişär NUM-DIST ;
üçär:üçär NUM-DIST ;
III:III NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
IX:IX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VI:VI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
VIII:VIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XI:XI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIII:XIII NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XIX:XIX NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XVI:XVI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
XXI:XXI NUM-ROMAN ; ! ""
LEXICON ProperNouns 
Lara:Lara NP-TOP ; ! ""
Gaziantep:Gaziantep NP-TOP ; ! ""
Lüksemburg:Lüksemburg NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Peterburg:Peterburg NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Kars:Kars NP-TOP ; ! ""
Niina:Niina NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Mıhailo:Mıhailo NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Eda:Eda NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Mall:Mall NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Rain:Rain NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Valdur:Valdur NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Svetlana:Svetlana NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Liviya:Liviya NP-TOP ; ! ""
afrika:afrika NP-TOP ; ! ""
Vinţent:Vinţent NP-TOP ; ! ""
Georgi:Georgi NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Aili:Aili NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Atilla:Atilla NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Lii:Lii NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Süleyman:Süleyman NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Viiu:Viiu NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Tõnu:Tõnu NP-ANT-M ; ! "
Piret:Piret NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Kaarel:Kaarel NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Tiiu:Tiiu NP-ANT-F ; ! ""
Leo:Leo NP-ANT-M ; ! ""
Gana:Gana NP-TOP ; ! "" ! 
Girne:Girne NP-TOP ; ! "" ! 
Sankt%-Peterburg:Sankt%-Peterburg NP-TOP-RUS ; ! ""
Mold%-Expo:Mold%-Expo NP-AL ; ! ""
Vikipediya:Vikipediya NP-AL ;
Hristoz:Hristoz NP-AL ; ! ""
Türkvizion:Türkvizion NP-AL ; ! ""
DELTA:DELTA NP-AL ; ! ""
API:API NP-AL ; ! ""
FM:FM NP-AL ; ! ""
MRKP:MRKP NP-AL ; ! ""
GRT:GRT NP-AL ; ! ""
SSCB:SSCB NP-ORG ;
GRT:GRT NP-ORG ; ! ""
FETÖ:FETÖ NP-ORG ; ! ""
SP:SP NP-ORG ;
GHT:GHT NP-ORG ;
GRT:GRT NP-ORG ;
SSR:SSR NP-ORG ;
UNESCO:UNESCO NP-ORG ;
OBSE:OBSE NP-ORG ;
İskilip:İskilip NP-TOP ; ! ""
LEXICON Cognomena
Çam:Çam NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Tõnisson:Tõnisson NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Pamukov:Pamukov NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Arhipoviç:Arhipov NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Georgeviç:Georgev NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
İvanaviç:İvanav NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Matveeviç:Matveev NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Panteleeviç:Panteleev NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Sergeeviç:Sergeev NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Afanasiyeviç:Afanasiyev NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Arkadieviç:Arkadieviç NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Zainçikovskiy:Zainçikovsk NP-COG-SKIJ ; ! ""
Baranovskiy:Baranovsk NP-COG-SKIJ ; ! ""
Golubovskiy:Golubovsk NP-COG-SKIJ ; ! ""
Mayakovskiy:Mayakovsk NP-COG-SKIJ ; ! ""
Livovskiy:Livovsk NP-COG-SKIJ ; ! ""
Berezovskiy:Berezovsk NP-COG-SKIJ ; ! ""
Kirilov:Kirilov NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Altuhov:Altuhov NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Jekov:Jekov NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Morozov:Morozov NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Statov:Statov NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Tabun:Tabun NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Köroolu:Körool NP-COG-OGLU ; ! ""
Dimitroglu:Dimitrogl NP-COG-OGLU ; ! ""
İrioglu:İriogl NP-COG-OGLU ; ! ""
Kolioglu:Koliogl NP-COG-OGLU ; ! ""
Petrioglu:Petriogl NP-COG-OGLU ; ! ""
Tanosoglu:Tanosogl NP-COG-OGLU ; ! ""
Altleis:Altleis NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Demirel:Demirel NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Bülbüloğlu:Bülbüloğl NP-COG-OGLU ; ! ""
Konstandoglu:Konstandoglu NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Ömeroğlu:Ömeroğl NP-COG-OGLU ; ! ""
Olak:Olak NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Peev:Peev NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Pokşişevskiy:Pokşişevsk NP-COG-SKIJ ; ! ""
Pokrovskiy:Pokrovsk NP-COG-SKIJ ; ! ""
Tamannıklı:Tamannıklı NP-COG-SKIJ ; ! ""
Randoja:Randoja NP-COG-MF ; ! ""
Teetsov:Teetsov NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Kerimov:Kerimov NP-COG-OV ; ! ""
Födoroviç:Födorov NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
Petroviç:Petrov NP-PAT-VICH ; ! ""
LEXICON Adjectives 
genç:genç A2 ; ! ""
politehnik:politehnik A1 ; ! ""
sekond% hand:sekond% hand A1 ; ! "" 
aralıksız:aralıksız A2 ; ! ""
başarısız:başarısız A2 ; ! ""
zakonsuz:zakonsuz A2 ; ! ""
sebepsiz:sebepsiz A2 ; ! ""
belli:belli A1 ; ! ""
yaklaşık:yaklaşık A2 ; ! "approximate"
kenarsız:kenarsız A2 ; ! ""
çölmek:çölmek A1 ; ! ""
islää:islää A1 ; ! ""
ii:iyi A2 ; ! !! ! Err/Orth
käämil:käämil A1 ;
kesin:kesin A1 ; ! ""
batak:batak A1 ; ! ""
hırsız:hırsız A2 ; ! ""
bronza:bronza A1 ; ! ""
LEXICON Abbreviations
V%.:V%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
Ê%.:Ê%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
İ%.:İ%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
N%.:N%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
R%.:R%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
Ț%.:Ț%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
F%.:F%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
Ş%.:Ş%. ABBR-INIT ; ! ""
s%ä:s%ä  ABBR ;
yapr%.:yapr%. ABBR ; ! ""
F:F ABBR ; ! ""
OOO:OOO ABBR ; ! ""
y%e:y%e  ABBR ; ! ""
T:T ABBR ; ! ""
s%n:s%n ABBR ; ! ""
K:K ABBR ;
ncü:ncü ABBR ;
